Missouri, session 2026, SB1262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 92.105, 92.111, and 92.115, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 92.105, 92.111, and 92.115, to read as
follows:
92.105. It is the intent of sections 92.105 to 92.125
that starting in 2011 voters in any city imposing an
earnings tax will decide in local elections to continue the
earnings tax. If the majority of local voters vote to
continue the earnings tax, it will continue for five years,
or in any city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, for ten
years, and then will be voted on again. If a majority of
voters in any city having an earnings tax vote against
continuing the earnings tax, it will be phased out pursuant
to section 92.125 in such city over a period of ten years.
Further, sections 92.105 to 92.125 prohibit any Missouri
city or town that does not, as of November 2, 2010, impose
an earnings tax, from imposing such a tax on residents and
businesses.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1262 2
92.111. 1. After December 31, 2011, no city,
including any constitutional charter city, shall impose or
levy an earnings tax, except a constitutional charter city
that imposed or levied an earnings tax on November 2, 2010,
may continue to impose the earnings tax if it submits to the
voters of such city pursuant to section 92.115 the question
whether to continue such earnings tax for a period of five
years, or if such city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, for a
period of ten years, and a majority of such qualified voters
voting thereon approve such question, however, if no such
election is held, or if in any election held to continue to
impose or levy the earnings tax a majority of such qualified
voters voting thereon fail to approve the continuation of
the earnings tax, such city shall no longer be authorized to
impose or levy such earnings tax except to reduce such tax
in the manner provided by section 92.125.
2. As used in sections 92.111 to 92.200, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, the term "earnings tax"
means a tax on the:
(1) Salaries, wages, commissions and other
compensation earned by its residents;
(2) Salaries, wages, commissions and other
compensation earned by nonresidents of the city for work
done or services performed or rendered in the city;
(3) Net profits of associations, businesses or other
activities conducted by residents;
(4) Net profits of associations, businesses or other
activities conducted in the city by nonresidents;
(5) Net profits earned by all corporations as the
result of work done or services performed or rendered and
business or other activities.

SB 1262 3
92.115. 1. Any constitutional charter city which as
of November 2, 2010, imposed or levied an earnings tax may
continue to impose or levy an earnings tax, pursuant to
sections 92.111 to 92.200, if it submits to the qualified
voters of such city on the next general municipal election
date immediately following November 2, 2010, and once every
five years thereafter, or if such city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, once every ten years thereafter, the question
whether to continue to impose and levy the earnings tax
authorized pursuant to sections 92.111 to 92.200, and if a
majority of qualified voters voting approve the continuance
of the earnings tax at such election.
2. (1) The question submitted to the qualified voters
in any such city, except for any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, shall contain the earnings tax percentage imposed
and the name of the city submitting the question and shall
otherwise contain exactly the following language:
Shall the earnings tax of ______ %, imposed by
the City of ______, be continued for a period
of five (5) years commencing January [1] 1st
immediately following the date of this
election?
□ Yes □ No
(2) The question submitted to the qualified voters in
any city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants
and located in more than one county shall contain the
earnings tax percentage imposed and the name of the city
submitting the question and shall otherwise contain exactly
the following language:

SB 1262 4
Shall the earnings tax of ______ %, imposed by
the City of ______, be continued for a period
of ten (10) years commencing January 1st
immediately following the date of this
election?
□ Yes □ No
3. If the question whether to continue to impose and
levy the earnings tax fails to be approved by the majority
of qualified voters voting thereon, the earnings tax levied
and imposed on November 2, 2010, shall be reduced pursuant
to section 92.125 commencing January first of the calendar
year following the date of the election held under this
section or January first of the calendar year following the
calendar year in which such election was authorized under
this section but not held by such city.
4. No city which has begun reductions of its earnings
tax pursuant to section 92.125 may, by ordinance or any
other means, with or without voter approval, stop or suspend
such reduction.
✓